Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 4

Interest and Borrowers

45-5-401. Contracts for interest — Computation.

With respect to loans where the amount financed is less than one hundred dollars ($100), this chapter permits, but does not require, interest to be contracted for by way of discount. Interest may also be contracted for at an effective rate that results in the same amount being paid as if interest had been contracted by way of discount at a nominal rate not in excess of the maximum nominal rate specified in § 45-5-301(2) for loans of this category, always subject to the maximum effective rate provided in § 45-5-301(2) for loans of this category.

With respect to loans where the amount financed is one hundred dollars ($100) or more, this chapter does not limit or restrict the manner or method of contracting for interest, whether by way of add-on, discount, or otherwise, so long as the maximum effective rate of interest for loans of this category does not exceed that authorized by § 45-5-301(2) for the loans.

With respect to loans made under open-end credit plans, interest shall be computed on the principal balance unpaid from time to time, always subject to the maximum effective rate provided in § 45-5-301(2) for loans of this category.

In any event, the maximum effective rate of interest on a loan shall:

Be determined in accordance with the actuarial method;

In the case of precomputed interest, be calculated and determined as of the date of the loan on the assumption that all scheduled payments will be made as contracted; and

Not be affected by the prepayment of the loan, in whole or in part.

Interest may be contracted for on the unpaid balance due after the maturity date of the loan:

Where the amount financed is less than one hundred dollars ($100), at an effective rate not to exceed eighteen percent (18%) per annum;

Where the amount financed is one hundred dollars ($100) or more, up to five thousand dollars ($5,000), at an effective rate not to exceed thirty percent (30%) per annum;

Where the amount financed is more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), at an effective rate not to exceed twenty-four percent (24%) per annum; and

Where the loan is made under an open-end credit plan, at an effective rate not to exceed twenty-four percent (24%) per annum.

The term of a loan for the purposes of this section commences on the date the loan is made. Differences in the lengths of months are disregarded and, for any period less than a month, each day may be counted as one-thirtieth (1/30) of a month.

Acts 1979, ch. 204, § 9; T.C.A., § 45-2009; Acts 1983, ch. 164, § 2; 2018, ch. 600, §§ 4, 5.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-5-101.

Acts 2018, ch. 600, § 6 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to loans made on or after March 23, 2018.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

45-5-402. Changes in payment schedules — Prepayments — Deferrals.

With respect to loans where the total amount of the loan is less than one hundred dollars ($100):

If the loan is precomputed and is prepaid in full, by refinancing or otherwise, more than thirty (30) days prior to its original maturity date, the borrower shall be entitled to receive a refund, or a refund credit, of any precomputed interest charge in an amount at least equal to the following:

If the loan is payable in periodic installments, an amount on each installment for the time each installment is so paid in advance of its due date at the maximum authorized nominal rate; or

If the loan is not payable in installments, an amount equal to that required in subdivision (a)(1)(A) and computed as if the loan was paid in consecutive equal monthly installments; and

No prepayment refund of less than one dollar ($1.00) need be made.

With respect to loans where the total amount of the loan is one hundred dollars ($100) or more:

Unless the parties to the transaction otherwise agree in writing, the installment loans shall be paid in accordance with the schedule of payments provided in the loan contract. The parties may, however, agree that the loan may be prepaid or that the payment of all or part of one (1) or more unpaid installments may be deferred, subject, however, to the limitations provided in this section;

In the event of prepayment in full, by refinancing or otherwise, of the installment loan:

With respect to a precomputed transaction that has an original term of sixty-one (61) months or less and that is scheduled to be repaid in substantially equal successive installments at approximately equal intervals, the amount required to prepay shall be the outstanding balance as of the applicable scheduled installment date; provided, that the borrower shall be entitled to a refund or credit of interest, the amount of which shall be no less than the amount computed in accordance with the Rule of 78, as follows: the amount of the refund or credit shall be as great a proportion of the total interest originally contracted for as the sum of the periodic time balances of the loan scheduled to follow the applicable scheduled installment date bears to the sum of all the periodic time balances of the loan, both sums to be determined according to the schedule of payments originally contracted for. The applicable scheduled installment date shall be the scheduled installment date next following the actual date of payment, unless payment is made on a scheduled installment date, in which case the date of payment shall be the applicable scheduled installment date;

With respect to a precomputed transaction that has an original term of more than sixty-one (61) months and that is scheduled to be repaid in substantially equal successive installments at approximately equal intervals, the amount required to prepay shall be the outstanding balance as of the date of prepayment; provided, that the borrower shall be entitled to a refund or credit of interest, the amount of which shall be no less than the amount computed in accordance with the actuarial method;

In a transaction not covered by subdivision (b)(2)(A), the amount required to prepay shall be the outstanding balance as of the date of payment, including any earned interest unpaid as of that date;

Where the amount of the refund credit is less than one dollar ($1.00), no refund credit shall be made. Any refund credit in the amount of one dollar ($1.00) or more may be made in cash or credit to the outstanding indebtedness of the borrower;

If the indebtedness created by the installment loan is fully satisfied prior to maturity through surrender of any collateral securing the loan, repossession of collateral, or any judgment, the outstanding obligation of the borrower shall be determined as provided in either subdivision (b)(2)(A) or (B), as may be appropriate, computed as of the date the registrant recovers the value of the collateral through disposition of the collateral, or the date judgment is entered in favor of the registrant, or, if the registrant elects to keep the collateral in satisfaction of the indebtedness, as of the date the registrant takes possession of the collateral. In the case of a precomputed transaction, if the date is other than a scheduled payment date, the next following scheduled payment date shall be used in the computation; and

The parties may, at any time, agree to a deferral of all or part of one (1) or more unpaid installments, and the registrant on the agreement may make and collect a charge for the deferral, subject to the following provisions:

A deferral postpones the scheduled due date of an installment or installments as originally scheduled, or as previously deferred, for the deferment period;

The deferment period is that period of time for which the payment is or the payments are deferred;

The deferral charge shall not exceed an amount equal to the result of applying the effective rate of interest provided in the original agreement between the parties, to the amount deferred for the deferment period, calculated without regard to differences in the lengths of months, but proportionately for a part of a month, counting each day as one-thirtieth (1/30) of a month. A deferral charge is earned pro rata during the deferment period and is fully earned on the last day of the deferment period;

If a loan is prepaid in full during a deferment period, then the registrant shall make or credit to the borrower a refund of the unearned deferral charge in addition to any other refund or credit made for prepayment in full;

A deferral charge may be collected at the time it is assessed or at any time thereafter;

Any payment received at the time of the deferment may be applied first to the deferral charge and the remainder, if any, to the unpaid balance of the loan, but if the payment is sufficient to pay, in addition to the appropriate delinquency charge, any installment that is in default, it shall be first so applied, and the installment shall not then be deferred or be subject to the deferral charge;

No installment on which a delinquency charge has been collected shall be deferred or included in the computation of the deferral unless the delinquency charge is refunded to the borrower or credited to the deferral charge;

In addition to the deferral charge, the registrant may make appropriate additional charges as provided in this chapter. The amount of the charges that are not paid in cash may be added to the amount deferred for the purpose of calculating the deferral;

The deferral agreement shall be evidenced in writing, which shall include:

The amount of the deferral charge;

The amount or amounts deferred;

The date to which, or the time period for which, payment is deferred; and

The nature and amount of any other charges made at the time;

No deferral charge may be made for a period after the date that the registrant elects to accelerate the maturity of the loan; and

An agreement to a deferral shall not affect the determination of the length of the term of the loan under § 45-5-302(2).

Acts 1979, ch. 204, § 10; T.C.A., § 45-2010; Acts 1983, ch. 164, § 3; 1988, ch. 705, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-5-101.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

45-5-403. Limitations on loan charges — Acquisition charges — Term of loan.

No registrant under this chapter has the power to charge loan charges other than, or in amounts greater than, the following:

Registrants may charge a service charge in an amount equal to four percent (4%) of the total amount of the loan, which charge may be deducted in advance from the principal of the loan. This service charge shall be in lieu of all other compensation for services, expenses, detriments or commitments directly incident to the loan, except those charges that are otherwise specifically provided in this chapter. This charge is authorized and limited on the basis that it is generally reasonably related to the total costs and expenses that it is designed to cover, and in order to make the amount of the charges more certain and readily ascertainable by the registrants, their borrowers and the commissioner; and to that end, registrants shall not be required to maintain detailed records with respect to the services, expenses, detriments or commitments covered by the charges. This charge shall not, however, be imposed on that portion of a loan used to pay any existing loan or part thereof owing by the same borrower or spouse, or both, to the same registrant or any affiliated lender;

In the case of open-end credit plans or in the case of loans secured by real property, in lieu of the four percent (4%) service charge provided in subdivision (a)(1)(A), registrants may charge borrowers with the actual, bona fide, reasonable expenses, directly incident to the loan, paid or to be paid by the registrant to third parties, including, but not limited to, expenses for title examination or title insurance, surveys, preparation of necessary documents, credit reports and appraisals;

In lieu of the four-percent service charge provided in subdivision (a)(1)(A), and for the same purposes, registrants may charge:

A flat service charge of two dollars ($2.00) on all loans that do not exceed twenty dollars ($20.00), and charge a flat service charge in addition thereto of fifty cents (50¢) per each five-dollar increase on all loans in excess of twenty dollars ($20.00) but that do not exceed one hundred dollars ($100), and to charge a flat service charge of ten dollars ($10.00) on all loans of more than one hundred dollars ($100); provided, that no lender may charge the flat service charge on multiple loans existing at the same time to any one (1) borrower;

In the event the borrower shall repay the loan in full within three (3) business days following the date of the loan, then all charges of every kind shall be refunded in cash; provided, that in the event a loan on which a flat service charge has been made shall be renewed, rescheduled or refinanced within forty-five (45) days of the date of the making of the loan, the flat service charge in connection with any new moneys advanced shall not exceed one-half (½) of the flat service charge that would be applicable thereto; and

It being the intent of the general assembly that the flat service charges permitted hereunder shall never be imposed on any portion of any loan used to pay any existing loan, or part thereof, owing by the same borrower or spouse or both to the same registrant or any affiliated lender;

Registrants may also charge the borrower with any fees or taxes paid, or to be paid, any public official for filing, recording or releasing any document relating to the loan. In lieu of charging the borrower with any fees for filing or recording any document relating to the loan, registrants may charge the borrower with any premiums payable for insurance in lieu of filing or recording the document; provided, that the premium shall not exceed the current fee for filing or recording the document. Moreover, the sum shall not be charged more than one (1) time during any twelve-month period;

Registrants may also charge a handling or delinquent charge of five cents (5¢) for each default in the payment of each one dollar ($1.00), or fraction thereof, or fifteen dollars ($15.00), whichever is greater, at the time any payment on any loan made hereunder becomes past due for a period of five (5) or more days; provided, that the charge shall not be collected more than once for the same default;

Registrants may also charge an installment maintenance fee of:

Two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) per month on loans where the total amount of the loan is less than one hundred dollars ($100);

Three dollars and fifty cents ($3.50) per month where the total amount of the loan is one hundred dollars ($100) or more but not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750);

Three dollars ($3.00) per month where the total amount of the loan is more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) but not more than one thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($1,250); and

Two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) per month where the total amount of the loan is more than one thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($1,250);

The fee may be charged for a period not to exceed the original term of the loan; provided, that the loan is made for a period of ninety (90) days or more; and provided further, that the monthly installment payments are at least fifteen dollars ($15.00) per month. No registrant may charge the installment maintenance fee on multiple loans existing at the same time to any one (1) borrower. The installment maintenance fees shall not be deducted in advance. Registrants may, however, include the maximum maintenance fee for the term of the loan in the face amount of the note evidencing that loan; provided, that neither interest, loan charges, delinquent charges nor insurance charges are computed on the amount; and provided further, that any installment maintenance fee due more than one (1) month following payment in full of the note shall be credited to the note;

Registrants may also require the payment by the borrower of any reasonable and actual attorneys' fees and other costs incurred in the collection or enforcement of any loan contract;

Registrants may also charge and collect from the borrower, through regular billing procedure or otherwise, a bad check charge as provided in § 47-29-102 for any check, draft, electronic funds transfer, electronic check, card payment, or any other electronic payment, negotiable order of withdrawal or like instrument drawn on a bank or other depository institution given by any person in full or partial repayment of a loan or other extension of credit if the instrument is not paid or dishonored by the institution; provided, that:

Registrants may redeposit the instrument with the institution or return the dishonored instrument to the borrower or person to whom the credit was extended upon redemption of the instrument; and

Registrants may collect not more than one (1) bad check charge on any one (1) check or electronic debit authorization;

In the case of a residential mortgage loan, a registrant may, from the service charge imposed under subdivision (a)(1)(A), pay a mortgage broker, licensed or otherwise exempt from licensing under the Residential Lending Brokerage and Servicing Act, compiled in chapter 13 of this title, a fee for the services actually rendered by the mortgage broker with respect to a specific transaction; provided, however, that the aggregate fee paid to a mortgage broker may not exceed the four percent (4%), which may be imposed under subdivision (a)(1)(A); and

Registrants may also impose and collect a convenience fee from any borrower making payment by credit card, debit card, electronic funds transfer, electronic check, or other electronic means in order to offset actual costs incurred by a registrant for accepting and processing payments made by electronic means;

Any convenience fee collected by a registrant pursuant to this subdivision (a)(9) may not exceed the actual costs incurred by the registrant; provided, however, a registrant may impose a convenience fee in lieu of the actual cost of the individual payment type that does not exceed the average of the actual cost incurred for the various types of electronic payments for which the registrant imposes a convenience fee;

Any registrant charging a convenience fee pursuant to this subdivision (a)(9) shall notify the customer of the amount of the fee prior to completing a transaction, provide an opportunity for the customer to cancel the transaction without incurring a fee, and make available the option to make a payment on a loan by check, cash, or money order directly to the registrant without the imposition of a convenience fee for a card payment or electronic payment;

When a borrower elects to make a payment to the registrant by credit card, debit card, electronic funds transfer, electronic check, or other electronic means and a convenience fee is imposed and collected pursuant to this subdivision (a)(9), the payment of the convenience fee shall not be refundable;

The convenience fee may be charged in addition to all other interest and fees allowed by law;

For purposes of this subdivision (a)(9)(B), “actual costs” means actual third party costs incurred for the processing of payments made by electronic means. If a registrant is a subsidiary of an entity that processes payments made by electronic means, then the parent entity shall be considered a third party;

A registrant shall not charge a convenience fee on any debit card or prepaid card transaction if the payment card network on which the transaction is initiated or processed prohibits such convenience fee by contract, rule or policy.

As an alternative to the loan charges permitted under subsection (a) and interest permitted under § 45-5-301, a registrant may charge loan charges in amounts no greater than the following:

On any loan of an amount of one hundred dollars ($100) or more up to and including the amount of three hundred dollars ($300), there shall be allowed an acquisition charge for making the loan not in excess of ten percent (10%) of the amount of the principal. In addition thereto, an installment account handling charge shall be allowed not to exceed twelve dollars ($12.00) per month;

On any loan of an amount in excess of three hundred dollars ($300) but not more than four hundred dollars ($400), there shall be allowed an acquisition charge for making the loan not in excess of ten percent (10%) of the amount of the principal. In addition thereto, an installment account handling charge shall be allowed not to exceed fourteen dollars ($14.00) per month;

On any loan of an amount in excess of four hundred dollars ($400) but not more than five hundred dollars ($500), there shall be allowed an acquisition charge for making the loan not in excess of ten percent (10%) of the amount of the principal. In addition thereto, an installment account handling charge shall be allowed not to exceed sixteen dollars ($16.00) per month;

On any loan of an amount in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) but not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), there shall be allowed an acquisition charge for making the loan not in excess of ten percent (10%) of the amount of the principal. In addition thereto, an installment account handling charge shall be allowed not to exceed twenty dollars ($20.00) per month;

On any loan of an amount in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000) but not more than one thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($1,250), there shall be allowed an acquisition charge for making the loan not in excess of ten percent (10%) of the amount of the principal. In addition, an installment account handling charge shall be allowed. The handling charge shall not exceed twenty-three dollars ($23.00) per month;

On any loan of an amount in excess of one thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($1,250) but not more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500), there shall be allowed an acquisition charge for making the loan not in excess of ten percent (10%) of the amount of the principal. In addition, an installment account handling charge shall be allowed. The handling charge shall not exceed twenty-six dollars ($26.00) per month;

On any loan of an amount in excess of one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) but not more than one thousand seven hundred fifty dollars ($1,750), there shall be allowed an acquisition charge for making the loan not in excess of ten percent (10%) of the amount of the principal. In addition, an installment account handling charge shall be allowed. The handling charge shall not exceed twenty-nine dollars ($29.00) per month; or

On any loan of an amount in excess of one thousand seven hundred fifty dollars ($1,750) but not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000), there shall be allowed an acquisition charge for making the loan not in excess of ten percent (10%) of the amount of the principal. In addition, an installment account handling charge shall be allowed. The handling charge shall not exceed thirty-two dollars ($32.00) per month.

The minimum term of any loan made under this subsection (b) is three (3) months. The maximum term of any loan made under this subsection (b) is twenty-five (25) months.

On the prepayment of any loan under this subsection (b), the installment account handling charges are subject to § 45-5-402 as it relates to refunds; provided, for the purpose of calculating the rebate due, the term of the loan begins on the date the loan is made.

On any loan established under this subsection (b), no insurance charge or any other charge of any nature whatsoever is permitted except as provided in this subsection (b) and except for the delinquent charge under subdivision (a)(4), the reasonable attorney fee and costs charge under subdivision (a)(6) and the bad check charge under subdivision (a)(7) and a convenience fee under subdivision (a)(9).

In a civil action, a finding by the court that a registrant has violated this subsection (b) gives rise to a rebuttable presumption that the violation constitutes unconscionable conduct under § 47-14-117(c), and the registrant is subject to the remedies under that section.

The loan charges allowed under this subsection (b) may not be imposed on a loan to a borrower who has one (1) or more loans outstanding with the same registrant or an affiliated lender and upon which loan charges were imposed under subsection (a).

Acts 1979, ch. 204, § 11; T.C.A., § 45-2011; Acts 1983, ch. 164, § 4; 1986, ch. 576, § 2, 3; 1987, ch. 124, § 2; 1988, ch. 621, § 1; 1989, ch. 265, § 1; 1990, ch. 685, § 1; 1996, ch. 607, §§ 1-4; 1998, ch. 576, § 1; 1999, ch. 172, § 3; 2000, ch. 684, § 1; 2001, ch. 165, § 8; 2006, ch. 563, § 1; 2009, ch. 499, § 7; 2012, ch. 534, §§ 1-5; 2014, ch. 616, §§ 1-4.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-5-101.

Acts 1996, ch. 607, § 5 provided that the amendments by that act apply to all loans made after July 1, 1996.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Loans, § 9.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1986, 54 Tenn. L. Rev. 457 (1987).

Attorney General Opinions. Loan charges under the Industrial Loan and Thrift Companies Act. OAG 14-82, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 85 (9/12/14).

45-5-404. Remedies of borrowers — Defenses — Limitations of actions.

The remedies of borrowers, the limitations on actions of borrowers, the defenses available to borrowers and to registrants, and the procedures applicable in the actions with respect to interest and loan charges under this chapter shall be those as prescribed by the general statute pertaining to interest and other charges by lenders or creditors.

Acts 1979, ch. 204, § 21; T.C.A., § 45-2021.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-5-101.

45-5-405. Interest on judgments.

When a judgment is based on a note or loan contract hereunder fixing a rate of interest within the limits provided herein, that judgment shall bear interest at the rate so fixed.

Acts 1979, ch. 204, § 22; T.C.A., § 45-2022.